Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Jurisdiction Over Correctional Facilities and Grounds

§ 47-5-1301.
United States jurisdiction over correctional facilities and grounds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, as a supplementary method for granting concurrent jurisdiction to the United States, the Governor of the State of Mississippi may grant to the United States full civil and criminal jurisdiction concurrent with the State of Mississippi over any correctional facility and the grounds of the facility in which are housed or located inmates committed to the custody of the United States or over any correctional facility and the grounds of the facility which are owned by a private entity that has entered into a contract for the confinement of inmates committed to the custody of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 530, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 10, 1997).